Texas, session 891, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter E, Chapter 86, Education Code, is amended by adding Section 86.83 to read as follows: Sec. 86.83.  INSTITUTE FOR ANIMAL HEALTH RESEARCH AND RESPONSE. (a) In this section: (1)  "Institute" means the Institute for Animal Health Research and Response. (b)  The Institute for Animal Health Research and Response is a component of Texas A&M University. (c)  The institute is under the management and direction of the Texas A&M Agrilife extension. (d)  The institute may employ personnel. (e)  The institute may accept a gift or grant from any public or private source for the benefit of the institute. (f)  The institute may make plans necessary for construction of facilities for research and response. (g)  The institute may enter into contract for space and facilities necessary. (h)  The institute may prioritize diseases or parasitic insect infestations over others. (i)  The institute shall, in partnership with the Texas Parks and Wildlife Department and the Texas Animal Health Commission: (1)  study the progression of animal diseases and parasitic insects; (2)  analyze the genetic profiles of animals infected with diseases or parasitic insects; (3)  develop: (A)  strategies to prevent diseases and parasitic insect infestations; (B)  efforts to mitigate transmission of diseases and parasitic insect infestations; and (C)  treatments for diseases and parasitic insect infestations; and (4)  evaluate the implementation of strategies, mitigation efforts, and treatments developed under Subdivision (3). (j)  The institute may conduct an activity described by Subsection (f) at a location: (1)  in which an animal infected with diseases and parasitic insect infestations was found; (2)  operated by Texas Parks and Wildlife; (3)  operated by Texas Animal Health Commission; or (4)  operated by the institute. SECTION 2.  The Texas A&M University System is required to implement a provision of this Act only if the legislature appropriates money specifically for that purpose. If the legislature does not appropriate money specifically for that purpose, the system may, but is not required to, implement a provision of this Act using other appropriations available for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2025.